tr: Ağızlık şekli: Kavisli; Sigara tipi; Düz; Yuvarlak; Düz; Ucu daralan; Diğer
bg-BG: Форма на мундщука: Извито; Като цигара; Плоско; Кръгло; Право; Конусовидно; Друго
es: Forma de la boquilla: Doblado; Como un cigarrillo; Plano; Redondo; Liso; Cónico; Otros
pt-PT: Forma do bocal: Curvada; Semelhante a um cigarro; Plano; Redondo; Liso; Afunilado; Outro
fi: Suukappaleen muoto: Taivutettu; Savukkeen kaltainen; Litteä; Pyöreä; Suora; Kapeneva; Muu
sk-SK: Tvar náustku: Ohnutý; Cigaretový; Plochý; Okrúhly; Rovný; Zúžený; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika ustnika: Upognjen; Cigaretni; Ploščata; Okrogel; Ravni; Zožena; Druga
zh-TW: 煙嘴形狀: 彎曲; 香煙形; 平坦; 圓形; 直形; 錐形; 其他
pl: Kształt ustnika: Zagięty; W stylu papierosa; Płaskie; Okrągłe; Proste; Zwężane; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 吹口形状: 弯曲型; 香烟型; 平口; 圆形; 直形; 锥形; 其他
nl: Mondstukvormen: Gebogen; Sigaretachtig; Vlak; Rond; Steil; Taps toelopend; Overig
ja: マウスピースの形状: 曲がった形状; タバコ形; フラット; ラウンド; ストレート; テーパード; その他
ro-RO: Forma muștiucului: Îndoit; Tip țigară; Plat; Rotund; Drept; Conic; Altele
lt-LT: Kandiklio forma: Išlenktas; Cigaretės tipo; Plokščias; Apvali; Tiesi; Smailėjanti; Kita
hu: Szipka formája: Hajlított; Cigarettaszerű; Lapos; Kerek; Egyenes; Kúpos; Egyéb
it: Forme del bocchino: Piegato; Simile a una sigaretta; Piatto; Rotondo; Dritto; Affusolato; Altro
en: Mouthpiece shape: Bent; Cigarette-like; Flat; Round; Straight; Tapered; Other
ko: 마우스피스 형태: 곡선형; 시가렛형; 플랫; 라운드; 일자형; 테이퍼드; 기타
nb: Munnstykkets form: Bøyd; Sigarettlignende; Flat; Rund; Rett; Avsmalnet; Annet
pt-BR: Formato do bocal: Curvado; Formato cilíndrico fino; Plano; Redondo; Liso; Cônico; Outro
el: Σχήμα επιστομίου: Κλίση; Σαν τσιγάρο; Επίπεδο; Στρογγυλό; Ίσιο; Κωνικό; Άλλο
ru: Форма мундштука: Изогнутый; Сигаретный; Плоский; Круглый; Прямой; Конусовидный; Другой
cs: Tvar náustku: Zahnutý; Cigaretový; Ploché; Kruhové; Rovné; Kuželovité; Jiné
da: Mundstykkeform: Bøjet; Cigaretlignende; Flad; Rund; Lige; Tapered; Andet
fr: Forme de l’embout du porte-cigarette: Courbé; Ressemblant à une cigarette; Plat; Rond; Lisses; Conique; Autre
vi: Hình dáng đầu ngậm: Cong; Giống điếu thuốc lá; Phẳng; Tròn; Thẳng; Vót nhọn; Khác
de: Mundstückform: Gebogen; Zigarettenähnlich; Flach; Kreis; Gerade; Abgeschrägt; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Oblik usnika: Savijeno; Oblik cigarete; Ravna; Okrugla; Ravna; Suženog vrha; Ostalo
th: รูปทรงของหัวกรองสูบบุหรี่: แบบโค้งงอ; ลักษณะคล้ายบุหรี่; เรียบ; ทรงกลม; ตรง; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
sv: Shapes: Böjd; Cigarettliknande; Platt; Rund; Rakt; Konisk; Övrigt